Tennessee, session 114, SB1423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 9, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
A student's report card must include a statement of the student's current reading
grade level.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to the 2025-2026 school year and subsequent school years.
SB1423
002771
- 1 -